Maryland, session 2026, HB0264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
14–4701.
(gg) “Sensitive data” means personal data that includes:
(1) Data revealing:
(i) Racial or ethnic origin;
(ii) Religious beliefs;
(iii) Consumer health data;
(iv) Sex life;
(v) Sexual orientation;
(vi) Status as transgender or nonbinary;
(vii) National origin; or
(viii) Citizenship or immigration status;
(2) Genetic data or biometric data;
(3) Personal data of a consumer that the controller knows or has reason to
know is a child; or
(4) Precise geolocation data.
Article – General Provisions
4–501.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 435
(a) In this section, “personal record” means a public record that names or, with
reasonable certainty, otherwise identifies an individual by an identifying factor such as:
(1) an address;
(2) a description;
(3) a fingerprint or voice print;
(4) a number; or
(5) a picture.
(b) (1) Personal records may not be created unless the need for the information
has been clearly established by the unit collecting the records.
(2) Personal information collected for personal records:
(i) shall be appropriate and relevant to the [purposes] LEGITIMATE
GOVERNMENT PURPOSE for which it is collected;
(II) SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE MINIMUM AMOUNT OF
PERSONAL INFORMATION NECESSARY TO ACCOMPLISH THE LEGITIMATE
GOVERNMENT PURPOSE FOR WHICH IT WAS COLLECTED;
[(ii)] (III) shall be accurate and current to the greatest extent
practicable; [and]
(IV) SHALL NOT BE RETAINED FOR LONGER THAN IS
REASONABLY NECESSARY TO FULFILL THE LEGITIMATE GOVERNMENT PURPOSE
FOR WHICH IT WAS COLLECTED;
(V) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE UNIT’S RETENTION SCHEDULE
OR AS ALLOWED BY LAW, SHALL BE SECURELY DELETED OR DE–IDENTIFIED WHEN
NO LONGER NEEDED TO FULFILL THE LEGITIMATE GOVERNMENT PURPOSE FOR
WHICH IT WAS COLLECTED; AND
[(iii)] (VI) may not be obtained by fraudulent means.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to units of the State.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, an official custodian who keeps
personal records shall collect, to the greatest extent practicable, personal information from
the person in interest.
– 3 –

Ch. 435 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) An official custodian who requests personal information for personal
records shall provide the following information to each person in interest from whom
personal information is collected:
(i) the LEGITIMATE GOVERNMENT purpose for which the personal
information is collected;
(ii) any specific consequences to the person for refusal to provide the
personal information;
(iii) the person’s right to inspect, amend, or correct personal records,
if any;
(iv) whether the personal information is generally available for
public inspection; and
(v) whether the personal information is made available or
transferred to or shared with any entity other than the official custodian.
(4) (I) Each unit of the State shall post A PRIVACY NOTICE AND its
privacy policies on the collection of personal information, including the policies specified in
this subsection, on its Internet website.
(II) THE PRIVACY NOTICE AND PRIVACY POLICIES POSTED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CONSISTENT WITH THE
GUIDELINES, STANDARDS, AND POLICIES ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY UNDER § 3.5–319 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(5) The following personal records are exempt from the requirements of
this subsection:
(i) information concerning the enforcement of criminal laws or the
administration of the penal system;
(ii) information contained in investigative materials kept for the
purpose of investigating a specific violation of State law and maintained by a State agency
whose principal function may be other than law enforcement;
(iii) information contained in public records that are accepted by the
State Archivist for deposit in the Maryland Hall of Records;
(iv) information gathered as part of formal research projects
previously reviewed and approved by federally mandated institutional review boards; [and]
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 435
(V) INFORMATION CONTAINED IN APPLICATION OR RENEWAL
MATERIALS RELATING TO THE LICENSING, REGISTRATION, OR CERTIFICATION OF
AN INDIVIDUAL FOR AN OCCUPATION OR PROFESSION; AND
[(v)] (VI) any other personal records exempted by regulations
adopted by the Secretary of Budget and Management, based on the recommendation of the
Secretary of Information Technology.
(d) (1) This subsection does not apply to:
(i) a unit in the Legislative Branch of the State government;
(ii) a unit in the Judicial Branch of the State government; or
(iii) a board of license commissioners.
(2) If a unit or an instrumentality of the State keeps personal records, the
unit or instrumentality shall submit an annual report to the Secretary of General Services.
(3) An annual report shall state:
(i) the name of the unit or instrumentality;
(ii) for each set of personal records:
1. the name of the set;
2. the location of the set; and
3. if a subunit keeps the set, the name of the subunit;
(iii) for each set of personal records that has not been previously
reported:
1. the category of individuals to whom the set applies;
2. a brief description of the types of information that the set
contains;
3. the major uses and purposes of the information;
4. by category, the source of information for the set; and
5. the policies and procedures of the unit or instrumentality
as to:
– 5 –

Ch. 435 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
A. access and challenges to the personal record by the person
in interest; and
B. storage, retrieval, retention, disposal, and security,
including controls on access; and
(iv) for each set of personal records that has been disposed of or
changed significantly since the unit or instrumentality last submitted a report, the
information required under item (iii) of this paragraph.
(4) A unit or an instrumentality that has two or more sets of personal
records may combine the personal records in the report only if the character of the personal
records is highly similar.
(5) The Secretary of General Services shall adopt regulations that govern
the form and method of reporting under this subsection.
(6) The annual report shall be available for public inspection.
(e) The official custodian may allow inspection of personal records for which
inspection otherwise is not authorized by a person who is engaged in a research project if:
(1) the researcher submits to the official custodian a written request that:
(i) describes the purpose of the research project;
(ii) describes the intent, if any, to publish the findings;
(iii) describes the nature of the requested personal records;
(iv) describes the safeguards that the researcher would take to
protect the identity of the persons in interest; and
(v) states that persons in interest will not be contacted unless the
official custodian approves and monitors the contact;
(2) the official custodian is satisfied that the proposed safeguards will
prevent the disclosure of the identity of persons in interest; and
(3) the researcher makes an agreement with the unit or instrumentality
that:
(i) defines the scope of the research project;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 435
(ii) sets out the safeguards for protecting the identity of the persons
in interest; and
(iii) states that a breach of any condition of the agreement is a breach
of contract.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–319.
(A) EACH UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT SHALL DESIGNATE A PRIVACY
OFFICER TO OVERSEE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE AND COORDINATE WITH
THE DEPARTMENT AND THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS, GUIDANCE, AND
MODEL TEMPLATES TO SUPPORT COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING
STANDARD PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT FORMATS AND DATA PROTECTION
PROTOCOLS.
13–115.
(a) The Department of Information Technology shall require basic security, DATA
COLLECTION, AND PRIVACY requirements to be included in a contract[:
(1) in] UNDER which a third–party contractor will:
(1) have access to and use State [telecommunication] INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY equipment, systems, or services; [or]
(2) COLLECT, STORE, OR PROCESS PERSONAL INFORMATION AS
DEFINED IN § 10–1301 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; OR
[(2)] (3) [for systems or devices that will] connect to State
[telecommunication] INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY equipment, systems, or services.
(b) The security requirements developed under subsection (a) of this section shall
be consistent with a widely recognized security standard, including National Institute of
Standards and Technology SP 800–171, ISO27001, or Cybersecurity Maturity Model
Certification.
(C) THE PRIVACY REQUIREMENTS DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSISTENT WITH WIDELY RECOGNIZED PRIVACY
STANDARDS, INCLUDING NATIONAL INSTITUTE OF STANDARDS AND TECHNOLOGY
– 7 –

Ch. 435 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(NIST) SP PRIVACY FRAMEWORK V1, NIST 800 SP 800–53 V5, AND NIST 800–207
SP ZERO TRUST ARCHITECTURE, AS THEY MAY BE UPDATED FROM TIME TO TIME.
Article – State Government
10–1301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) (1) “Personal information” means an individual’s first name or first initial
and last name, personal mark, or unique biometric or genetic print or image, in combination
with one or more of the following data elements:
(i) a Social Security number, AN INDIVIDUAL TAXPAYER
IDENTIFICATION NUMBER, A PASSPORT NUMBER, OR OTHER IDENTIFICATION
NUMBER ISSUED BY THE UNITED STATES GOVERNMENT;
(ii) a driver’s license number, state identification card number, or
other individual identification number issued by a unit;
[(iii) a passport number or other identification number issued by the
United States government;
(iv) an Individual Taxpayer Identification Number; or]
[(v)] (III) a financial or other account number, a credit card number,
or a debit card number that, in combination with any required security code, access code,
or password, would permit access to an individual’s account;
(IV) A USERNAME OR E–MAIL ADDRESS IN COMBINATION WITH A
PASSWORD OR SECURITY QUESTION AND ANSWER THAT PERMITS ACCESS TO AN
INDIVIDUAL’S E–MAIL ACCOUNT;
(V) GENETIC AND HEALTH–RELATED DATA, INCLUDING
MENTAL HEALTH, SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER, AND DISABILITY; OR
(VI) SENSITIVE DATA, AS DEFINED IN § 14–4701 OF THE
COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(2) “Personal information” does not include a voter registration number.
10–1702.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 435
(2) “Governmental entity” means a unit or instrumentality of State or local
government.
(3) “Personal record” has the meaning stated in § 4–501 of the General
Provisions Article.
(4) “SENSITIVE DATA” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–4701 OF
THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, on or before July 1, 2026,
each governmental entity, in consultation with the Department of Information Technology,
shall develop and publish procedures that prevent the sale and redisclosure of personal
records and geolocation data provided or made available by the governmental entity in a
way that harms the privacy of residents of the State.
(2) The procedures required and published under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall address:
(i) any possible contractual limitations on the sale or redisclosure of
personal records or geolocation data that a governmental entity may place on a person who
receives personal records or geolocation data that are provided or made available by the
governmental entity;
(ii) considerations regarding:
1. the threat to privacy posed by data brokers who utilize
personal records or geolocation data for commercial purposes;
2. the risk that personal records or geolocation data may be
used for purposes other than the purposes for which the personal records or geolocation
data were developed or collected; and
3. geolocation, genetic, and other sensitive data; and
(iii) any other considerations necessary to:
1. protect the privacy of residents of the State;
2. discourage the development of a secondary commercial
market for personal records or geolocation data that are provided or made available by a
governmental entity; and
3. limit a person who receives personal records or geolocation
data that are provided or made available by a governmental entity from selling or
redisclosing the data with other persons.
– 9 –

Ch. 435 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) On or before July 1, 2026, each governmental entity shall, in accordance with
§ 2–1257 of this article, submit to the General Assembly a copy of the procedures developed
under subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 10 –